Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 2. Appropriation and Use of Water.
Sec. 46.15.166.
Judicial adjudications.

Instead of initiating an adjudication under AS

46.15.165

, the commissioner may, with the concurrence of the attorney general, if a federal reserved water right has been or might be asserted by an agency of the United States on its own behalf or on behalf of a person described in AS

46.15.165

(c)(3) — (6), file on behalf of the state a complaint in superior court to initiate a judicial adjudication consistent with 43 U.S.C. 666 to quantify and determine the priority of all water rights in a drainage basin, river system, ground water aquifer system, or other identifiable and distinct hydrologic regime, including any hydrologically interrelated surface and ground water systems.

The venue for an action filed under (a) of this section shall be established by rule of the supreme court under AS

22.10.030

.

In a complaint brought under (a) of this section, the court may appoint an impartial, qualified person as a master to hold hearings, take testimony, collect evidence, and make recommendations to the court regarding the scope and content of a proposed judicial decree that would finally adjudicate the validity of water rights, quantify them, and determine priorities among the water right appropriations in the adjudication area. Employment by a federal, state, or local government agency does not disqualify an individual from appointment as master under this subsection if the court determines that the individual is otherwise impartial and qualified to act as master. The master may, with the court’s permission, take action that the commissioner would be authorized to take in an administrative adjudication under AS

46.15.165

.

In an adjudication under this section, the court may incorporate in an order or judgment final orders of the commissioner previously issued under AS

46.15.165

.

Proceedings under this section shall be conducted without a jury.

History.

(§ 6 ch 135 SLA 1986)

Sec. 46.15.167.
Effect of decision.

The final order of the commissioner under AS

46.15.165

and the final judgment of a court under AS

46.15.166

are binding on each party to the adjudication and on each person who subsequently makes an application for a water right. The court or the commissioner may retain jurisdiction for a period of time necessary to implement an adjudication order or judgment and to provide for subsequent water appropriations.

History.

(§ 6 ch 135 SLA 1986)

Sec. 46.15.168.
Other actions.

The state may timely intervene as a party in a superior court action potentially involving a determination of the validity, quantity, use, reservation, or priority of water rights.

The commissioner may accept a remand from a state or federal court of a water rights dispute and may administratively adjudicate the dispute under AS

46.15.165

.

The commissioner may enter into arbitration to resolve a water rights dispute.

The commissioner may incorporate and apply as binding upon the parties to an administrative adjudication under AS

46.15.165

any court decree concerning the state hydrologic regime involved in the adjudication.

History.

(§ 6 ch 135 SLA 1986)

Sec. 46.15.169.
Federal reserved water rights.

This chapter does not represent a commitment by the state to a specific federal reserved water right.

History.

(§ 6 ch 135 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative basin-wide adjudication, see 11 AAC 93, art. 8.

Sec. 46.15.170.
Effect of recording.

A deed, lease, contract, assignment of permit, or other instrument transferring an appropriation is void as against a subsequent innocent purchaser who in good faith paid a valuable consideration for the appropriation or any portion of it and whose instrument is first filed and recorded under AS

46.15.160(b)

.

A deed, lease, contract, assignment of permit, or other instrument transferring an appropriation that is recorded under AS

46.15.160(b)

is constructive notice of its contents to subsequent purchasers of the appropriation or any portion of it. An unrecorded instrument is valid between the parties to it and as against one who has actual notice of it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966)

Sec. 46.15.175.
Termination of permit for violation.

If the commissioner has reason to believe that a person who holds an appropriation permit under this chapter is wilfully violating or has wilfully violated a term, condition, restriction, or limitation of the permit, the commissioner may commence proceedings to terminate the appropriation permit under AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

(Administrative Procedure Act).

When an appropriation permit is terminated under this section, the appropriation of water made by the permit reverts to the state and becomes unappropriated water.

History.

(§ 8 ch 175 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

46.15.145

. Renumbered as AS

46.15.147

in 1980. Renumbered again in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For appropriation and use of water, see 11 AAC 93, art. 2.

Sec. 46.15.180.
Crimes.

A person may not

construct works for an appropriation, or divert, impound, withdraw, or use a significant amount of water from any source without a permit, certificate of appropriation, or authorization issued under this chapter;

violate an order of the commissioner to cease and desist from preventing any water from moving to a person having a prior right to use it;

disobey an order of the commissioner requiring the person to take steps to cause the water to move to a person having a prior right to use it;

fail or refuse to install meters, gauges, or other measuring devices or control works;

violate an order establishing corrective controls for an area or for a source of water;

knowingly make a false or misleading statement in a declaration of existing right.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Crimes under this section are in addition to any other crimes provided by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966; am § 7 ch 100 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Organized into subsections in 1987, at which time minor word changes were made to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes and implement the reorganization.

Cross references. —

For fines and sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For enforcement, see 11 AAC 93, art. 6.

For appeals, see 11 AAC 93, art. 7.

For critical water management areas, see 11 AAC 93, art. 9.

Sec. 46.15.185.
Appeals.

Appeals to the superior court under this chapter are subject to AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

(Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For critical water management areas, see 11 AAC 93, art. 9.